Alaska, session 34, HB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section 05 to read: 06 REPORT TO THE COMMISSIONER OF HEALTH: FINANCIAL 07 RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN REFERRING HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS AND 08 PROVIDERS OF HEALTH CARE SERVICES. (a) On or before September 1, 2026, each 09 licensed health care provider in the state who, as part of their licensed practice, refers a patient 10 to receive any of the health care services, supplies, or equipment listed in (f) of this section 11 shall report to the commissioner of health, on a form provided by the commissioner, a 12 description of any financial relationship the referring health care provider has with 13 (1) a person that provides services, supplies, or equipment listed in (f) of this 14 section, if the referring health care provider refers patients to that person as part of their 01 licensed practice; 02 (2) an immediate family member of a person who provides services, supplies, 03 or equipment listed in (f) of this section, if the referring health care provider refers patients to 04 that person as part of their licensed practice; the information provided under this paragraph 05 must include the name of the immediate family member and the licensed health care 06 provider's name and professional license number. 07 (b) On or before September 1, 2026, each licensed health care provider in the state 08 who refers a patient for a health care service, supply, or piece of equipment listed in (f) of this 09 section shall report to the commissioner of health, on a form provided by the commissioner, 10 the number of patient referrals the health care provider made for the services, supplies, or 11 equipment and the name of the person to whom the health care provider referred the patient 12 for the service for fiscal year 2026. 13 (c) On or before September 1, 2026, each person who provides services, supplies, or 14 equipment listed in (f) of this section shall report to the commissioner of health, on a form 15 provided by the commissioner, the amount the person billed in fiscal year 2026 for each 16 health care service, supply, or piece of equipment listed in (f) of this section that the person 17 provided to a patient who was referred to the person by a licensed health care provider with 18 whom the person 19 (1) has a financial relationship or who has an immediate family member with 20 whom the referring health care provider has a financial relationship; 21 (2) has no financial relationship. 22 (d) A licensed health care provider who is subject to (a) and (b) of this section or a 23 person who is subject to (c) of this section shall provide any additional information to the 24 commissioner of health that the commissioner considers necessary to complete the report 25 authorized by sec. 2 of this Act. 26 (e) Any personally identifying information of patients, licensed health care providers, 27 or immediate family members of a person who provides services, supplies, or equipment 28 reported to the commissioner of health under this section is confidential and is not a public 29 record for purposes of AS 40.25.110 - 40.25.140. 30 (f) Patient referrals for the following services, supplies, or equipment must be 31 reported as provided under (a) - (c) of this section: 01 (1) clinical laboratory services; 02 (2) physical therapy, occupational therapy, and outpatient speech-language 03 pathology services; 04 (3) radiology and diagnostic imaging services; 05 (4) radiation therapy services and supplies; 06 (5) durable medical equipment and supplies; 07 (6) parenteral and enteral nutrients, equipment, and supplies; 08 (7) prosthetics, orthotics, and prosthetic devices and supplies; 09 (8) home health services; 10 (9) outpatient prescription drugs; and 11 (10) inpatient and outpatient hospital services. 12 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE: FINANCIAL INTERESTS IN SERVICES. (a) 15 The commissioner of health shall prepare a report examining the frequency at which health 16 care providers make patient referrals to a person who provides health care services, supplies, 17 or equipment and with whom the referring provider also has a financial relationship and 18 describing the amount billed for the referred services, supplies, or equipment. The 19 commissioner of health shall use the information reported under sec. 1 of this Act to prepare 20 the report. The report must include the following information for fiscal year 2026: 21 (1) the number of patient referrals made by each referring health care provider 22 for services, supplies, or equipment to be provided by a person with whom the referring health 23 care provider, or an immediate family member of the referring health care provider, has a 24 financial relationship, and the amount billed for each service, supply, or piece of equipment; 25 (2) the number of patient referrals made by each referring health care provider 26 for services, supplies, or equipment to be provided by a person with whom the referring health 27 care provider has no financial relationship, and the amount the provider of the services, 28 supplies, or equipment billed for each service, supply, or piece of equipment. 29 (b) Before the first day of the First Regular Session of the Thirty-Fifth Alaska State 30 Legislature, the commissioner of health shall deliver a copy of the report prepared under (a) 31 of this section to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and 01 notify the legislature that the report is available. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.